Authors
Laurie D. T. Mann
Number of Reviews
35

Title
Review for Gremlins 2: The New Batch (1990)
     I fell asleep during TURTLES, was mildly amused by BTTF III, but
had a terrific time at GREMLINS 2 today.  Yes, it's true, the
performances by the special effects are generally better than the
performances by the actors, and the film has more rubber logic than
most, but it's FUN!
     Yes, you can guess the story.  Gizmo winds up in a research lab
after his owner, the old Chinese man, dies.  The research lab in in
"Clamp Tower," a massive New York sky scraper that contains various
cable networks (including things like "The Archery Network" and "The
Safety Channel"), a mall, restaurants, and the headquarters for Clamp
International.  Of course, Billy and Kate, the heros from the first
film, also happen to work in that building.  Billy rescues Gizmo from
the genetics lab (run gleefully by Christopher Lee), but your typical
series of catastrophes happen to little Gizmo and gremlins rapidly
infest the entire building.
     Since there's a genetics lab to trash, the gremlins mutate into a
variety of bizarre creatures, including a winged gargoyle,
spider-monster, and a quasi-intellectual, pipe-smoking Yuppie.  There
are more sight-gags, parodies and wonderful bits throughout this movie.
There's the "Movie Police," "Microwaving with Marge," and some amusing
cameos by various Warner Brothers characters.  There's an on-target
parody of Kate's "Why I Hate Christmas" speech (though it was a tad too
long) from the first movie, and great satire of corporate personality
throughout the film.
     The movie is rated PG-13, though most of the violence happens to
gremlins and to the set rather than to any humans.  Our nine-year-old
was liked the movie, but didn't really start laughing at it until after
the gremlins popped out all over.
     The puppetry and radio-controlled gremlins in this movie were both
extremely well-done.  The gremlins have a little more personality in
this film than in the first one.
     GREMLINS 2 took a good idea and made it better.  I hope Dante &
company quit while they are ahead.  I'm not sure how the movie is doing.
We saw it in an empty theater today, which is a shame because the movie
is a blast.
*** Laurie Mann ** harvard!m2c!jjmhome!lmann ** lmann%jjmhome@m2c.m2c.org ***
***           Laurie_Mann@es.stratus.com  ***  uunet!lectroid!es!Laurie_Mann     ***

Title
Review for Born on the Fourth of July (1989)
     While there are a few missteps in the movie, the acting is superb.  I
never really considered Tom Cruise an actor until I saw this film.  Oliver
Stone continues building on his reputation as a director who creates visceral,
gut-wrenching movies.  An 8 or 9 on the Chuck scale.
     BORN ON THE FOURTH OF JULY is the true story of Ron Kovic, a
rabble-rousing Viet Nam paraplegic and how he got that way.  The film opens
idyllically in the late '50s, when little Ronny Kovic is playing soldiers with
his friends.  The action switches to the 4th of July parade, where we meet
Ronny's ever-growing family, and Donna, the girl who'll break his heart
eventually.  The scenes of Massapequa, New York are scenes of a safe home,
where the greatest danger is Mom finding a Playboy in teenaged Ronny's room.
     As a teenager, Ronny is a driven idealist who goes into the Marines right
after graduation.  The action jumps ahead three years, and we see Sargeant
Kovic, an almost-hardened soldier.  Almost immediately, there's shooting and
death, and within fifteen minutes of the film's arrival in Vietnam, there's
the awful scene of Ron Kovic going down fighting, followed by five minutes of
hell in the field hospital.  I couldn't watch most of the field hospital
sequences; it was some of the most gruesome stuff I'd ever seen.  But it was
never gratuitous.  The audience is as numbed by the gore as Ron Kovic was.
     The next sequences in the Bronx VA hospital are so outrageous that they
can only be true.  Kovic pushes himself, and pushes some more, and eventually
is forced to realize that he'll never walk again.  He never really accepts
that, or his experiences in Vietnam, and sinks into alcoholism after he
returns home to Massapequa.
     A lot goes on in the 2-1/2-hour running time of this movie.  His
conversion to a militant pacifist and vet against the war happens pretty
quickly near the end of the movie.  But Tom Cruise really makes us believe that
Ron Kovic spent the first few years of his physical paralysis as a sort of
emotional spastic.  A person who let the world go on so long as he could drink,
and would only occasionally let the rage show.
     The supporting cast, particularly the actors who play Kovic's parents, are
all fine.  Willem Dafoe has a great turn as a drugged-out paraplegic Kovic
meets in Mexico.
2.  Vietnam looked too much like Mexico.  That's because Stone shot
        the Vietnam portions in Mexico.  Then he chose almost IDENTICAL
        opening shots (incredibly yellow aerial shots of sand dunes) to
        establish both locales (Kovic goes to Mexico for some R&R).
4.  Same problem with Donna.  The movie strongly implies that she's
        gotten married, and she introduces Kovic to anti-war protests.
        She also completely disappears from the movie.
6. The movie could have been trimmed by about another five minutes with
        no damage done, particularly the murky scene after the very
        dramatic disruption of the Republican National Convention.
/*I'm a woman by nature, a mother by choice.  ** Capitalist for choice!
Laurie Mann   **   harvard!m2c!jjmhome!lmann  ** lmann%jjmhome@m2c.m2c.org
Work: Stratus Computer ** Home: Northboro, MA ** lmann@jjmhome.UUCP          */

Title
Review for Ghost (1990)
     No, you will *not* believe in ghosts after seeing GHOST, unless you
were predisposed to believe in them already.  But, you will see a movie
that is a wonderful blend of love story, thriller, and comedy.  And,
yes, I think it worked.
     The plot is simple, though it has a few interesting twists.
Patrick Swayze and Demi Moore move into a big old loft apartment.
Swayze is in finance at a bank, and Moore is a sculptor.  Swayze is
murdered, and his ghost runs into the movie.  While it appears to be a
random killing at first, the ghost learns that one of his co-workers was
out to get some computer security codes, and that he may now be out to
get Moore.  In order to reach Moore, he finds Whoopi Goldberg, a
"spiritualist."
     The movie is at its best when it plays with people's beliefs about
ghosts and the afterlife.  Goldberg is a charlatan until Swayze finds
her, and she isn't sure what to do with him.  Moore desperately wants to
believe that Goldberg has contacted Swayze, but the evidence is stacked
against her.  And Swayze wants to reach Moore, in order to save her
life, but he can't contact her directly, since he's a ghost.
     This is *not* an "actors'" movie.  Whoopi Goldberg is on hand,
playing her classic smart-mouthed, street-wise broad with an attitude
and she's a hoot.  Both Patrick Swayze and Demi Moore are ernest,
adorable, and moving.  A character actor who played one of the patients
in Cuckoo's Nest and one of Salieri's servants in Amadeus gives a great
performance of a ghost trapped in the New York subway.
     The biggest flaw in this movie is the editing.  Many scenes run on
too long.  The director and film editor should have shaven about 10-20
minutes from the movie, and would have made a better, tighter movie.
*** Laurie Mann ** harvard!m2c!jjmhome!lmann ** lmann%jjmhome@m2c.m2c.org ***
***           Laurie_Mann@es.stratus.com  ***  uunet!lectroid!es!Laurie_Mann     ***

Title
Review for Witches, The (1990)
     We saw the last (SNIFF!) Jim Henson movie over the weekend, a
marvelous movie called THE WITCHES.
     THE WITCHES starts off in modern day Norway, with some fabulous
scenes of flight over the glaciers.  A grandmother tells her
impressionable grandson all about witches and how to avoid them.  His
parents are abruptly killed, and his grandmother takes him home to
England, and then to a seaside resort for a little vacation.
     The seaside resort is also the the meeting place for the annual
witches convention.  The grandmother recognizes an old adversary, and
the grandson stumbles over a meeting of the witches' annual meeting.
     In this movie, witches look much like regular women, except that
they wear wigs, elaborate rubber masks, and gloves.  When the meeting
begins, the witches "let down their hair" so to speak, and a room of
fairly normal-looking women becomes a gaggle of bald crones.
     As the Grand High Witch, Angelica Houston is given truly hideous
makeup in this scene.  She's a wonderful presence in the film, but she
speaks with a really awful Germanic accent.  That accent was one of the
few missteps in the film.  (I think the ending was a slight misstep too,
but, if Dahl wrote the ending that way, I'm not going to complain too
much.)
     Aside from the witch makeup, another wonderful bit of makeup
effects occur when people are turned into mice, an occurrence which
happens throughout this movie.  When the grandson and a friend of his
are turned into mice, the camera looks at the world from their
point-of-view---about 1/4 inch off the ground.
     I don't want to give too much away about this marvelous and
inventive film.  Go see it, and take the kids unless they are sensitive
or easily frightened.
     (This was X-posted to sf-lovers because I think THE WITCHES is
currently the strongest contender for the dramatic presentation Hugo
next year.  It completely blows BACK TO THE FUTURE III out of the
water.)
***  Laurie Mann ** lmann@jjmhome.UUCP ** lmann@bigbootay.sw.stratus.com  ***

Title
Review for Star Trek: First Contact (1996)
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
Prediction:  Jonathan Frakes will be the first former
Star Trek cast member to win an Oscar for best direction.
Though he won't win for Star Trek 8, he'll go on to do
impressive work in the future.  Frakes' sure direction
and the wonderful ensemble acting of Star Trek 8 carry 
the movie.  Sure to the past trend, the even-numbered
Star Trek movies continue to blow the odd-numbered movies
out of the water.
Using the Borg as the big screen bad-guys was a good idea,
but mixing in two Star Trek cliches in the movie (time
travel and another I choose not to mention here) could have
come close to sinking the ship.  That said, if the Star
Trek writers were going
to dabble in the past again, why not "resurrect" Zeframe
Cochran (a radically different Zeframe Cochran from the
one present 30 years ago, but... ;-> ), the man who both
invented warp drive and initiated Earth's first contact
with aliens?  The view of mid-20th century Earth as
dystopia was kind of depressing, but not nearly so bad as
assimilation plan the Borg wanted to unleash.
The Borg go back to the past to prevent Cochran from launching
his primative warp drive ship, and, of course, the crew of the
Enterprise follow along to stop them.
At one point, pretty early in the movie, it almost
looks like the Enterprise has everything under control.
While the Borg damaged Cochran's test ship
the Enterprise destroyed a Borg ship and found Cochran's
test ship (cleverly built in an
abandoned missle silo).  However, the Borg had managed 
to sneak onboard and start assimilating the 
Enterprise and its crew.  That leaves Picard, Data,
Crusher, Worf and some "red shirts" on the Enterprise to
duke it out with the Borg, and Riker, Troi and Geordie
on the Earth to find Cochran and make sure his damaged warp
ship takes off as planned.
The acting is just great, including James Cromwell (Babe, and
some STNG episodes) and Alfre Woodard (Cross Creek, Grand Canyon).
Woodard does more with her eyes than many actors can do with
their whole faces.  Another great bit of casting was Alice 
Krige as the Borg queen, as malicious a character as Star Trek
writers have ever created.  When I reviewed Generations two years
ago, I said:
   Generations lurches off your screen with lots of destroyed
space        ships, massive plot holes, and a few really great scenes
mixed 
   in just to make it frustrating. Patrick Stewart and Brent Spiner 
   are so good it's like they're in another movie. All the women      
characters are completely and frustratingly wasted.
   The direction is also wildly erratic....
This time, everyone in the cast is terrific, though Stewart and
Spiner still outshone the other actors.  The female crew 
members were a  little stronger, but I still would like to see 
more of Sirtis and MacFadden in a Star Trek movie.
While I found the plot a little stupid, it was a more logical story
than Generations, and the dialog was sharp. My plot quibbles 
might be more because I've seen so much Star Trek and read so
much science fiction over the years.  I'm
not sure if a "novice viewer" would have more plot quibbles or
fewer.  To their credit, the writers did turn almost ever
Star Trek cliche they used on its ear, particularly in a climatic
scene late in the film between Woodard and Stewart.  And many
scenes used in the trailers and commercials were taken out of
context in an unusual fashion - the movie would then go off in
a wholly different and wonderful direction.
As with most Star Trek movies, there are wonderful comic
bits that are fun, but these didn't ruin the flow of the movie.
The special effects, particularly the opening shot in the movie,
are just first-rate. 
This movie is definitely worth your time, and rates a strong
8 on the IMDB rating scale.
I hope that when they start to write the next Star Trek movie
that they think about creating an original story, and one
without time travel.  Between all the time travel in this
movie and in the recent TV shows, it's a science fiction cliche
I'd like to see less of.  
-- 
*** Laurie D. T. Mann ** lmann@city-net.com ***
******* http://www.city-net.com/~lmann ********
**** Please note new E-mail and home page *****

Title
Review for Henry & June (1990)
     This is the movie that forced the MPAA to create a new rating.
Maybe I'm just getting old, but I can't figure out *why*!  There is a
fair amount nudity in the movie, but the sex scenes are generally not
all that erotic.
     HENRY & JUNE is supposed to be the true story of Anais Nin & Henry
Miller, both famous writers.  The "June" in the title is Miller's wife,
June, a woman whose very picture alters the lives of characters in this
movie.  Perhaps it's the sort of movie that if you're a fan of either
writer, it works on the level of providing lots of background.  Since
I'm not, I didn't like the movie as much as I expected to.
     It really doesn't have much of a plot.  The movie follows Anais &
her husband Hugo, sort of '30s French yuppies, as they drift from place
to place and discuss that Anais will probably have an affair with an
older man.  Enter Henry Miller.  The relationships between Anais, Hugo,
and Henry are quite complicated.  Anais wants Henry, both as a fellow
writer and as a person who clearly enjoys sexual experimentation.  Henry
wants sex wherever he can get it, but he's very cautious around Anais.
Hugo pretty much ignores the situation, though it's clear he knows more
about it than Anais thinks he does.
     The performances are okay, but not much to write home about.  The
actress portraying Anais Nin is particularly good (a new, young Spanish
actress, playing Anais with a wonderful French accent).  The French
accents clash with the strong Brooklynese of both Fred Ward (playing
Henry Miller) and Uma Thurman (playing June).  With the exception of
Anais, the characters were in desperate need of charisma transplants to
pull this film off.  Kaufman has cast his movies very successfully in the
past, and I'm not sure why he didn't succeed this time (though Alec
Baldwin was originally supposed to have played Miller).
     The photography in this movie is lovely.  The point of view in this
movie wanders---many scenes are shot in mirrors, so it's a little
disconcerting at times.  The distinctions between dreams and reality are
not very well defined, which made reality a little difficult to follow.
The dialogue is fine, but the plot is *very* slow-going, and would have
benefited by a little tightening.  There are some good scenes, and
whenever June confronts someone, you know she often speaks the truth.
There are also a few lovely observations during the course of the movie
about sex and desire, and these observations are often quite subtle.
     On the whole, I can only give this movie a 6 on the Chuck scale.
The movie promises a lot but fails to deliver.  If you want to see a
truly erotic movie, go back and rent THE UNBEARABLE LIGHTNESS OF BEING.
Kaufman did it right that time....
     While I don't think there are particular spoilers in this movie, I
suppose I ought to warn you just in case...
     Perhaps the main reasons for the new rating relate more to the
treatment of morality in the movie.  There is quite a bit of nudity in
the movie, both in a long parade of under-costumed art students, and in
several scenes in a brothel.  When Hugo tells Anais he'll do anything
sexual for her, she takes him to a brothel and they watch female
prostitutes perform sexually for each other.  When the prostitutes ask
them to join in, they decline.  While the lesbian aspect of the film has
been discussed quite a bit, the most explicit material is in the
afore-mentioned scene in the brothel.  And it really wasn't all that
erotic---the scene in LIGHTNESS when one woman photographs the other
was much more charged.
     While Anais spends most of the movie lusting after June, it's clear
nothing ever would have worked out between them.  Anais is a cultured
European, and June is a Brooklyn taxi dancer.  Anais is generally very
controlled, and June is just explosive.  June is portrayed as an
unbelievably manipulative bitch in this movie.  Henry is a somewhat
softer version of June, but he has the ability to be an artist,
something that June, even though she supports him, just doesn't
understand.
***  Laurie Mann ** lmann@jjmhome.UUCP ** lmann@bigbootay.sw.stratus.com  ***

Title
Review for Always (1989)
     There's something very special about a Steven Spielberg movie starring
Richard Dreyfuss.  Dreyfuss tends to give some of his more thoughtful work, and
Spielberg tends to give him pretty interesting roles.  ALWAYS, which sounds a
lot like an old escapist movie (and is, in fact, based on "A Guy Called Joe")
is just a wonderful, engrossing movie.  A solid 8 on the movie scale.
     The story is simple---a pilot who fights fires is killed and is called by
Hap (Audrey Hepburn) to be the guardian angel of a fire pilot in training.
Before Pete (Dreyfuss) is killed off, there are some terrific fire-fighting
scenes, and a long, rowdy night in a bar as we follow Pete, his lover Dorinda
(Holly Hunt), and their friend Al (John Goodman).  The chemistry between
Dreyfuss and Hunt is great.
     Talking plot in a movie like this is pretty meaningless.  What counts are
the performances and they are uniformly wonderful.  Goodman continues to be the
ultimate support man, and is very powerful when he's angry.  Hunter, Dreyfuss,
and Brad Johnson (an incredible hunk (who wears glasses even!)  who plays the
new fire pilot) are great.  The fire-fighting scenes are very exciting.  The
ending was so engrossing that I completely stopped hearing an annoying alarm
that was going off in the theater until the credits rolled.
Laurie Mann   **   harvard!m2c!jjmhome!lmann  ** lmann%jjmhome@m2c.m2c.org

Title
Review for Edward Scissorhands (1990)
     Yep, I'm catching up on my movie-going.  I have to, with both
HAMLET and AWAKENINGS opening up on the same weekend here next month!
     Anyway, Leslie and I went to see EDWARD SCISSORHANDS today, the
modern fable about the manufactured boy with scissors for hands.  It was
a fine movie, made with intelligence and wit.  Tim Burton scores another
winner.  It won't make nearly the money that BATMAN did, but at least
BATMAN gave him the clout to continue making off-beat films like Edward.
     Like all the other Burton movies, the film dances between the real
world and someplace else entirely.  The "real world" here has the look
and feel of California in the mid-60s.  Peg, the friendly Avon lady,
played by Diane Wiest with just the right amount of Girl Scout, finds
Edward, abandoned, in a creepy old castle surrounded by wonderful
topiary.  She takes Edward home, and, in the tradition of Chance, the
gardener from BEING THERE, he agrees.  Edward is played by Johnny Depp,
and he gives a marvelous performance, balancing his need for love
against the fact he's been left alone for much of his life.  Like most
movies of this type, the "alien" has the biggest heart, and displays the
most humanity.
     The supporting cast is kind of a "Greek Chorus" to the proceedings,
and act in concert throughout the movie.  Most of the supporting cast,
led ably by Kathy Baker and Conchetta Ferrell, are bored 1960s housewives
who spend their time entrenched in one another's lives.  Other members
of the cast include Alan Arkin as Bill, the archetypal 1960s Dad, and
Anthony Michael Hall (remember when he was the skinny dweeb back in 16
CANDLES?) as Kim's menacing boyfriend.
     Kim is played by Winona Ryder, Peg & Bill's all-American daughter.
She is horrified by Edward at first, but eventually becomes his friend.
Ryder is literally transformed in this movie, from being a vacuous
teenager early in the movie to taking enormous risks for Edward by the
end of the film.
     When you go see this movie, remember that it is a fairy tale, like
"Beauty and the Beast."  Tim Burton makes his points about humanity and
isolation without beating you over the head with them.  This is one of
the best movies I've seen this year.
     Kid rating---Leslie hid at some of the parts where she felt Edward
was going to be embarrassed (you can see most of these moments coming).
The language was a little strong at times, and there were some fights
but no gore.  The movie may be a little slow for kids who need action to
keep them interested in a film.

Title
Review for Postman, The (1997)
I really wanted to like this movie.  I loved the original David
Brin novella, which was written in the early '80, and even Brin
himself has said that the shooting version of the script 
wasn't too bad.  The Postman was one of the most frustrating movies 
I've ever seen.  Parts of it are close-to-brilliant, but it's
terribly bogged down by too much Kevin Costner and by a
very weak editing.
There are times, especially early in the film, when "too
much Kevin Costner" is very appropriate.  The opening shots
of Costner wandering in a desert wasteland and being overjoyed
when he comes across an ancient 76 gas station to plunder
is a fine bit of moviemaking.  Setting up the lead as
a somewhat sympathetic borderline-con-man works well.
These early bits exhibit subdued humor - that you really need
a sense of humor to survive in a post-apocalyptic society.
The movie starts to bog down when Costner is captured by
the Holnists.  Costner, the director, felt it necessary to
hit the viewer over the head by the violence and nastiness 
of the Holnists.  It was frankly unnecessary.  (Yes, it was
necessary to show some of this, and to indicate some of the
pecking order.  However, information conveyed in this sequence
telegraphed the ending 2 1/2 hours before the ending finally happened.)
Once Costner has escaped from the Holnists and stolen the
clothes off the skeleton of a postman, he doesn't immediately
"become" "the postman."  He's taken the mail as a diversion,
and suddenly realizes he can use the mail to talk his way into
getting dinner at a very suspicious town.  That was a good bit,
but catastrophe soon follows the Postman whereever he goes.
Still, he's managed to inspire other survivors to think about
delivering the mail.
One particularly pointless sequence sends the postman and a woman
he's impregnated into the woods for a few months.  While it was
necessary to the plot get him out of the way for a while, just simply
having the occassional narrator say "And he stayed away for a few
months, regaining his strength...." could have covered the situation.
When the postman returns to what's left of civilization, he finds
one of his followers has turned delivering the mail from a hack to
a real service.  The teenager, "Ford Lincoln Mercury," has banded 
together with other people, mostly teenagers, to restart 
communication between the scattered towns.  It's a wonderfully-directed
sequence, in which the postman realizes he's little more than a myth
and it's the kids who are the true believers that things can get better.
Costner's oldest daughter plays "Ponytail," one of the mail carriers,
and she does a great job.
Since things seem to be going well, that must mean the Holnists have
to come over and cause trouble. Massacres ensue and Costner tries to
disband the mail carriers to save their lives.  The film gets even
more muddled here, though there are some amusing sequences up on
a high dam that's become a town ruled by Tom Petty ("Were't you
famous once?" Costner asks).  Finally, Costner leads an army against
the Holnists, and guess what happens?  
In The Postman, it's almost as if different people directed different
aspects of the film. The camera work was generally pretty good and 
the feel of a post-apocalyptic America is fine.  Costner, the director,
keeps  making movies that open strong and ultimately fail.  
I enjoyed most  of Dances With Wolves, but I thought the last half 
hour of the  movie came close to ruining the whole thing for me.  
With The Postman, the directoral problems were much more apparent
much earlier.  I was noting unnecessary scenes as I was watching them.
-- 
Laurie D. T. Mann        ***      lmann@ISPcity-net.com
   (Delete all caps to spam-bust the E-mail address.)
Dead People Server:  http://www.city-net.com/~lmann/dps

Title
Review for Robin Hood: Prince of Thieves (1991)
     The long-awaited, long-hyped version of Robin Hood hit the screens
last night.  Was it worth it?
     This version isn't as much fun as, say, the Errol Flynn version.
It's a more serious, subdued, uneven movie.  There is some wonderful
photography, the sets look very medieval, and most of the costumes are
pretty good.  The main problems in the movie are the fault of the novice
director (the only other movie this director had made was Heathers) and
that script.  Costner's accent problems pale beside these major flaws.
Still, the movie is definitely worth viewing on the big screen.  Once,
anyway.
     This movie opens in a hideous Islamic prison in Jerusalem.  A
reasonably illogical thing happens, permitting Robin Hood (Kevin
Costner) and Azheem (Morgan Freeman) to escape.  Back in England,
Robin's father (an all-to-brief performance by Brian Blessed) is
murdered by the sheriff of Nottingham (a scene-chewing performance by
Alan Rickman) and his "merry" men.  So by the time Robin arrives in
England, all hell has broken loose.
     Some of the best scenes in the entire movie are some sweeping shots
of the English countryside as Robin watches Sir Guy of Gisborn set dogs
on a 12-year-old boy.  Robin, naturally, intercedes, killing a few
knights and rescuing the boy.
     Part of the problem with this movie is the far-too-campy
performance by Alan Rickman as the sheriff, and the really awful lines
he is given to say.  Rickman, who played the memorable Hans in DIE HARD,
was completely out-of-control in this movie.  Costner gives a very
earnest performance as Robin, and his accent is unbelievably
inconsistent.  Both Morgan Freeman and Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio give
the only really strong performances of the film, although the actors who
play the thieves and their families were all fine.
     Getting back to the script for a minute, anachronisms abound in the
attitudes of the characters.  While there were a few Moors in England at
this time, given that the Crusades were in full force, it's unlikely
Azheem would have wanted to go to England, or that he would have
survived for very long once he was there.  You have the sheriff talking
about his "sanity," which was practically an unknown concept back at
that time.  You have a very odd speech about "nobility" that Robin
gives, and a rousing, but equally odd speech given by Azheem about
freedom.  I don't expect screenwriters to have their characters speak in
genuinely medieval English---it would have been almost unintelligible to
the average film viewer.  But I do expect screenwriters to have done
enough research about the period and not give their characters
unreasonable attitudes given the time.
     The screenwriters did successfully portray the fact that the Moors
were technologically superior to the English at that time.  Azheem makes
a few remarks about "savages," cooly assists at a difficult birth, and
tries to teach Robin how to use a telescope.  (Robin doesn't get it)
     One other problem with this movie---though it's rated PG-13, it has
a few really gross little twists in it.  It's not a good movie for
sensitive children (or adults!).  There are also two attempted rapes, a
hand amputation, hangings, various cuttings, and lots of sword & arrow
play.  The film editing was a little sloppy; about ten minutes could
have been cut with no loss whatsoever.
Spoilers (but if you know the Robin Hood story, not really)
     There are only two small surprises in this movie, but both were
unbelievably telegraphed.  There is something of a surprise at the very
end of the movie.  At least, it was a surprise to most of the audience,
who started applauding and cheering for the first time in the entire
film.
     The climax of this movie had that really stupid plot device of a
character that should have been dead already returning for one last
attack on Robin and Marion.  This was a tired hack a few years ago.  Why
do screen writers persist on doing this????  Why do producers and
directors let them?

Title
Review for Soapdish (1991)
     SOAPDISH was sneaked here last night.  It's a very sharp satire of
soap operas.  If you need a silly movie and just want to laugh for 90
minutes, you can't do much better than SOAPDISH.  I hadn't laughed so
much at a movie in a long time.
     In SOAPDISH, Sally Field plays an hyperactive, aging ingenue,
Whoopi Goldberg reprises her wise woman from Ghost, Robert Downey Jr.
plays a young producer torn in about fifteen different directions, and
Cathy Moriarty steals the show as Montana, a vixenish actress who plays
a nurse.  Garry Marshall (normally the director of movies like Pretty
Woman) does an amusing turn as "the man from upstairs," the network
executive in charge of daytime programming.  There are lots of surprises
in this movie, and probably most of them don't hold up to much scrutiny,
but what-the-hell.  The movie goes to truly ridiculous lengths about how
silly soaps are, and how neurotic most people involved with soaps are.
You may need to have been a soap fan at one point in your life to truly
appreciate this movie, but I suspect if you liked the soap opera stuff
in TOOTSIE, you'll enjoy SOAPDISH.

Title
Review for Parenthood (1989)
[This originally appeared as two separate postings, one in rec.arts.movies and
one in soc.women. -ecl]
     I have mixed emotions about this movie.  So mixed that I have to look at
this movie as "entertainment" and "political statement."  Let me deal with the
entertainment value of the film first, and then the political ramifications.
     As entertainment, the movie was very good.  The pacing was generally
excellent, and Howard had good control over a *very* large and uniformly good
cast.  I thought Martha Plimpton, Steve Martin, Jason Robards, and the kid who
played Kevin were all terrific.  I have mixed feelings about Dianne Wiest, whom
many people have singled-out for praise.  She seemed too nice, too accomodating
to the rather strange whims of her son and daughter.  (By the way, I normally
love Wiest, and thought she was wonderful in PURPLE ROSE OF CAIRO, FOOTLOOSE,
and, especially, in HANNAH AND HER SISTERS.)
     This movie is so middle-American that it takes place somewhere near
St. Louis.  Jason Robards is the father of four children:  Dianne Wiest, Steve
Martin, ??? (Susan---Which actress played her??  What movies has she been in)??,
and Tom Hulce.  Wiest is divorced with two children, Martha Plimpton and Leaf
Phoenix (yes, who *else's* brother would have a name like "Leaf"?).  Martin is
married to Mary Steenburgen, and they have three young children, including one
(Kevin) who's been labelled as emotionally disturbed by his school.  Yes, Kevin
does tend to break into tears and wimp out easily, but....  ??? (Susan) is
married to Rick Moranis and has a 3-year-old that Moranis is training to be a
child prodigy.  And Hulce is the prodigal son of the family, and surprises his
older siblings by appearing at a party with his young son.  The son was the
offspring of an affair with a black woman, who is currently on the run from the
law, which is why Hulce suddenly has him.
     The movie has *many* good lines in it, and a few outrageous sight gags.
One that stands out features Martin holding what he *thinks* is a flashlight
after a brief power outage.  The children were very well-cast and directed for
the film.  One bad or over-done performance would have been bad for the balance
of the picture.
     Anyway, I do recommend this movie, despite the fact that the excellent
pacing fell to little pieces during the last ten minutes of the film, and the
fact that several characters make absolutely unvelievable transformations in
incredibly short periods of time.  However, I do have some major problems with
the treatment of women in this movie, which I'll go into detail in in another
newsgroup.
     One poster recently mentioned that she brought her school-aged child to
the film, and thought the sex jokes went right over the kid's head.  Leslie
picked up on almost every sex-reference in the movie (except for, thank
goodness, the afore-mentioned sight gag), and tended to ask "What do they
mean?" only to have me respond "Oh, I'll try to explain it to you later."
Like when you're 12.  This really isn't a good movie for a preadolescent.
Leslie thought the movie was very funny (many of the other jokes can be
comprehended by kids).
     Aside from the fact we went to the movie to get out of the rain (we were
camping Acadia National Park this weekend, so we saw the film in Bar Harbor's
Carilion (?)  Theater, a 1932 art-deco movie house), I was curious about
Leslie's reactions to the children in the film.  She particularly enjoyed the
overly-taught child.   Hmmm....
Andd now for the political ramifications:
DISCLAIMER:  In a number of interviews, the writers of this film have said they
drew on their experiences as fathers to create the movie.  I don't think they
deliberately intended to write a movie that so strongly promoted the old
"anatomy is destiny" cliche.  But that's how much of the movie came off.
The theme of Parenthood appears to be threefold:
        Children, especiallly babies, can make anything go right.
     In this movie, we are introduced to a number of families.  Gil (Steve
Martin), a basically nice guy, is still scarred by the way his father ignored
him as a child, and has a son who's severely oversensitive.  His older sister
(Dianne Wiest) is a divroced woman coping with two teenagers, one of whom
marries VERY young and the other of whom is absolutely non-communicative.
Their younger sister Susan is married to a man who's practically taken her out
of the loop of parenthood, by drilling their three-year-old in academia.  And
their younger brother (Tom Hulce) is a charming ne're-do-well who arrives with
a surprise son.
At the center of this group is Jason Robards, their father who lavishes more
attention on his antique car than on his wife or his grown children or his
young grandchildren.  Yes, he's messed up badly, and even he admits that he
wasn't such a hot father.
1.  Robards' wife is practically a non-entity in this movie.  She appears in
    many scenes, but is given almost nothing to do.   This doesn't make lots of
    sense.  Since it was clearly established that Robards was a lousy father,
    did she make up for it by being "SuperMom"?  Probably not.  She was
    extremely unassertive.
2.  The grandmother (Robards' mother-in-law) was shifted around from house to
    house like a piece of kitchen equipment.  This lack of a permanent address
    seems to have no effect on a woman in her late 80s.  Now, this woman was
    relatively sharp and even says that she likes life to be more like a roller
    coaster than like a merry-go-round.  Still....
3.  Susan lets her husband Nathan (Rick Moranis) walk over her to an enormous
    degree.  Her revenge?  During most of the movie, it's eating junk food in
    the closet (apparently not in the pattern of a bulimic, but just in the
    pattern of a woman who can't get through to her spouse).  She finally
    leaves him.  After a few weeks, he can't stand it anymore, so this man
    who's always been so stodgy serenades her in front of her class.  He goes
    onto become a much more relaxed father when she goes back to him.  We
    surmise this because after almost 2 hours of him saying that kids need to
    be trained and playing was a waste of time, he's shown making funny faces
    with his daughter.
4.  Dianne Wiest's daughter (Martha Plimpton) marries young and almost
    immediately becomes pregnant.  Wiest stressed early in the film how
    important college was and how bright this girl really was.  By the time
    she learns her daughter is pregnant, she has completely stopped arguing
    with her, other than to convince the young couple to stay together.
5.  This movie makes birth control out to be a joke.  Susan has sabotaged her
    diaphram, something Nathan discovers after a routine check of it!!!!!  Gil
    is told he's going to be a father for the fourth time on the same day he's
    quit his job.  Abortion is briefly discussed, but not considered an option
    since Gil's wife was opposed to having one (by the way, I'm not advocating
    that any woman should be forced to have an abortion).  Since this movie is
    almost more fantasy than reality, Gil gets his job back with a raise a few
    weeks later, so his lack of income was only temporary.  By the end of the
    movie, every  couple in the movie who could have possibly had a baby either
    had a new baby or was pregnant.  I like kids, but I found the simplistic
    attitude towards having them to be really offensive.  The teenagers were in
    no way ready to have a baby; they couldn't even manage their own
    relationship.
     Now, it may sound like I really hated the movie.  Actually, I really liked
it.   THe performances are very good, and while I found myself hating the plot,
the dialogue is pretty sharp.  There are many very funny moments in the movie.
But it bothered me, too.    

Title
Review for Gettysburg (1993)
     I am not a war buff, but I was intrigued by everything I read
about GETTYSBURG, and like the actors cast, so I decided to go.
     It was an incredible example of excellent movie-making.  I started
reading Michael Shaara's THE KILLER ANGELS as soon as I got home, and
really regret not finding that book years ago.
     What else has its director, Ronald F. Maxwell, made?
     What makes this movie particularly good is that it avoids many of
the cliches of "epic movie-making."  There really aren't many sweeping
battle shots, except for a few long shots of maneuvering troops and
some as the South is making its final charge across the field.  The
movie focuses on character in a way I've rarely seen in war movie.  The
ambiguity of fighting against your former comrades is a major theme
throughout the movie.  The movie also focuses in on the claustrophobia
many soldiers must feel in battle.  There is an awful lot of carnage in
the movie, but little gore,
     The performances are uniformly excellent.  Both Jeff Daniels and
Tom Berringer give sterling performances as Col. Chamberlain and
General Longstreet.  Both played men of great foresight and courage,
though Longstreet was just passed his prime as a leader and Chamberlain
hadn't quite reached his peak (or may have just reached his peak at
Gettysburg).  Martin Sheen is wonderful as General Lee.  Special kudos
also to Richard Jordan as General Armistead (who, sadly, died just
after he finished making the movie), Sam Elliott as General Buford, and
Kevin Conway who gleefully steals every scene he's in as Buster.
     The adaptation of the book is remarkable.  I have never seen
characters so well-translated to the film, or an author's vision
rendered so fully in a movie.  I hope Shaara, who'd be 64 this year,
lived to see the movie.
     At just over four hours, the movie isn't particularly long.  I
looked at my watch less often during this movie than I had during THE
AGE OF INNOCENCE (which I also liked ... but it dragged ...).
** Laurie Mann * lmann@drycas.club.cc.cmu.edu * Laurie.Mann@genie.geis.com **

Title
Review for Hook (1991)
     A few weeks ago, Robin Williams joked, "Hey, HOOK stars the stars
of ISHTAR and POPEYE and was directed by the man who brought you 1941,
so it has a history of people familiar with bombs."
     HOOK isn't a complete dud, but it's disappointing given the amount
of hype its gotten.
     HOOK has a great premise: What if Peter Pan grew up?  According to
an article in PREMIERE magazine, the premise popped out of the mouth of
the six-year-old son of the scriptwriter one day.  IMHO, most of the
problems in the film relate to the script and the direction.  Most of
the magic in the film is the credit of the art direction team, who
created a phenomenal Never-Never Land, and the special effects team, who
orchestrated some terrific flying.
     There's a long opening sequence in California showing what a
work-obsessed Yuppie Peter Banning (Robin Williams) is.  There's a lot
of unneeded setup between the time the movie opens, and the time a very
elderly Wendy (a winning performance by Maggie Smith) tells Peter that
"you are Peter Pan."  This sequence could have been minimized because
Peter's troubled relationship with his kids is done-to-death once
Captain Hook spirits the kids to Never-Never Land.
     Once TinkerBell drags Peter off to Never-Never Land to rescue his
kids, the action picks up, but only slightly.  There's some lovely
business around Hook realizing what a mundane dud Peter is now, and how
TinkerBell promises Hook to get Peter in to shape for a proper war.
     I've already mentioned that the movie has a lot of extraneous stuff
in it, but there are also a few inexplicable edits in it (okay, you can
attribute these inexplicable things to "magic," but still...).  One
weird quick cut shows Peter being hoisted into the Lost Boys treehouse,
but you never know *who* does it.  There are also some "magical" costume
changes.
     The biggest misstep of the movie was its handling of the Lost Boys.
Spielberg often does a great job directing one or two children at a
time, but the writing and direction of the Lost Boys stunk.  Most of the
boys were updated into punky or overly cute American kids.  It just felt
wrong.  There were too many "cute shots" of the kids, and a lot of
incredibly crude language at times.  Peter's acceptance by the boys was
tentative at first, but once Peter started believing in himself, they
started believing in him.
     One writing/directing problem in this movie is the same problem
that plagued 1941: You can see *everything* coming miles away.  There
are few surprises.  Also, there are two sequence that scream "THEME PARK
RIDE!"  I had this same feeling from THE ADDAMS FAMILY, where some stuff
felt like it was added to the movie for the sole purpose of being
developed into a theme park ride.
     I haven't talked about the acting of the main characters, and I
guess its because I have such mixed feelings about it.  IMHO, Peter Pan
is a role Robin Williams was born to play, but he almost does a better
job as Peter Banning, mundane, than Peter Pan, the eternal child.  While
Dustin Hoffman doesn't chew the scenery as Hook, he wavers wildly
between being a buffoon and being quite terrifying.  Charlie Korsimo is
alternately affecting and obnoxious as Peter's son Jack.  The girl who
plays the daughter, Maggie, is cute and spirited.  Julia Roberts is fine
as TinkerBell, but her performance seemed strange, and it just might
have been because she rarely acted *with* anyone.  They aren't terrible,
but they appeared to wear their characters like clothing.  On the other
hand, Bob Hoskins is wonderful as Smee, as is the actor who plays
Toodles, another aged Lost Boy.  Look for Phil Collins, David Crosby,
and Glenn Close in cameos.
     The essential problem with the script is it can't decide if its an
overblown fairy tale, or if it's a serious movie about parents and
children.  There are some genuinely affecting moments in the movie, but
there are other times when I felt blatantly manipulated.  So I think
that is where HOOK fails the most----if you can really get in to a
movie, you don't feel manipulated.
     In short, HOOK isn't a bomb, but it just doesn't deliver very much.
If you like the trappings of a film you might like it because there's a
lot to admire about the production.  Unfortunate, it doesn't include the
script.

Title
Review for Dances with Wolves (1990)
     I'm not a Western fan at all, but when I first saw the trailer for
DANCES WITh WOLVES last fall, I knew I'd go see it.  The photography in
the movie is absolutely gorgeous.  Kevin Coster and the team that
photographed the movie did a magnificent job.
     The story is very simple on the surface.  A Union soldier asks to
be posted to the frontier after he accidentally becomes a hero after
being wounded in a battle.  Dunbar (Costner) wants to see the frontier
before it becomes shopping malls, and I can't say I blame him. (:-))  He
wants to see buffaloes.  His post turns out to be a deserted sod hut on
the prairie.  He's alone, and while he wonders why his relief never
shows up, he enjoys his solitude.
     Eventually, the local Indians find him, and they learn to trust one
another.  Communication between them is quite difficult, but it is made
a little easier when a white woman who has lived with the Indians since
her childhood agrees to "make the white man's talk."  The woman, Stands
with Fist, is portrayed by Mary McDonell.  The Indian holy man, Kicking
Bird, is portrayed by Graham Greene.  Greene gives a wonderful
performance, and McDonell's is a little more tentative (though so is her
character).
     Gradually, Dunbar spends more and more time with the Indians.  In
the movie's highlight, he joins them on a buffalo hunt which is a
magnificently photographed sequence.  Costner deserves enormous credit
in pulling that one off.
     Most of the movie is quite subtle and understated.  The photography
is the real star, the long shots of the prairie.  So when reality
"intrudes" about a half hour before the ending of the film, it's
jarring.  I suspect the people who gripe about revisionism in the movie
are complaining about this portion of the film.  The movie is quite long
and leisurely but never boring.  It also feels quite realistic until the
ending.
     While I still think AWAKENINGS was the best movie of last year,
DANCES WITH WOLVES is so strong for so long that it comes close to being
a great movie.  For a first directorial effort, Costner deserves an A.
     Aside from the ending, the Barry score is the film's other major
weakness.  John Barry hasn't written an original score in many years.
He wrote a nice military piece that's used in the beginning, but isn't
used for the rest of the movie.  Barry's score is okay, and it suits the
movie, but it isn't at all original.  If you've seen KING KONG [the
remake -Moderator] or OUT OF AFRICA or MOONRAKER, you've heard the score
already.
     This movie is an 8 on the Chuck scale.  I think it will win Best
Picture, Best Actor, and Best Cinematography.

Title
Review for Only the Lonely (1991)
     We saw ONLY THE LONELY last night, the new John Candy movie.  It
was pretty good, and it was neat to see the return of Maureen O'Hara in
a movie, after a twenty-year retirement.
     ONLY THE LONELY is a leisurely, funny look at Danny Muldoon
(Candy), an Irish cop who lives with his mother (O'Hara) in Chicago.
His mother is the Irish version of Archie Bunker, a woman who spews
ethnic slurs at a remarkable rate.  This pair is unbelievably
co-dependent---while the advertising emphasizes the mother's hold on her
son, Danny also has remarkable trouble letting go.
     Danny meets Theresa Luna (Ally Sheedy) by accident, goes off in
search of her, and asks her for a date.  Theresa agrees, and the date
comes off as a study in awkwardness.  Both people are essentially shy,
and while Danny uses constant talking to cover his shyness, Theresa is
so withdrawn that even telling Danny she had had fun is very hard for
her.
     This film is one of John Hughes' few forays into describing the
lives of working-class people, and he did a pretty good job.  While the
movie tries to be pretty realistic, there are a few moments of unreality
in the last third of the movie.  I'd probably rate it a 7 on the Chuck
scale.
     My main problem with the movie was Danny not showing up for his
wedding.  Mom had even given her blessing, yet he just couldn't do it.
Danny believed in good appearances, and while he might have had an
incredible anxiety attack, he would have been there!

Title
Review for Hamlet (1990)
     HAMLET is a superbly-produced version of Shakespeare's play, with
strong performances all around.  Zeffirelli catches the look and feel of
medieval Europe very well.
     Zeffirelli's HAMLET opens at the funeral of King Hamlet, and cuts
quickly to a feast, about two months later, when Queen Gertrude has
married her dead husband's brother, King Claudius.  The old king Hamlet
has been almost forgotten, except by his grieving son, Hamlet.  Nothing
can rouse Hamlet from his stupor, and seeing the ghost of his father
unhinges him.
     Hamlet seems unhinged by more than his father's ghost.  The spectre
of sex also unhinges him.  He's torn by his feelings for Ophelia, his
feelings for his mother, and his convictions that his mother has
dishonored his father.  His madness is more than just a mask---he's
loosing it early in the film, and spends the rest of the movie loosing
it.
     Mel Gibson gives a fine performance as Hamlet.  I particularly
liked Helena Bonham-Carter, who gives a really strong performance as
Ophelia.  Ophelia comes off as a very weak woman in most productions of
HAMLET, but in this version you can hear the passion in her voice.  Glen
Close and Alan Bates portray Queen Gertrude and King Claudius as
love-sick adolescents, but it works very well.  And Ian Holm is
sufficiently dottering as the advice-giving Polonius.
     In HENRY V, Kenneth Branagh kept the frame of a theatrical
production around the film, by starting the movie on a sound stage and
keeping the Chorus (Derek Jacobi) in the film.  Zeffirelli completely
divorces Hamlet from theater, and opens up the play by adding a few
short scenes that had only been described in the original.  While I tend
to be a purist about original material,  the additions keep true to the
spirit of the play.
     My only reservation about the movie is that Gibson's performance is
a little erratic.  His early scenes of madness are a tad too wild-eyed.
He is brilliant late in the movie, particularly in the climatic scene
with Gertrude.  However, Hamlet is a tough role to simply "act" in; it
requires a theatrical performance.
     It's rated PG-13.  I'm not sure why--the killings aren't
particularly brutal, there isn't much in the way of bad language, and
the sex is only implied.  (Actually, the "country matters" speech was
said somewhat more laciviously than I'd seen before, and Hamlet attacks
Gertrude in an almost rape-like manner.)  Our ten-year-old begged to go,
so we took her.  Unfortunately, she was rather bored by it.  (I forgot
to note earlier that she enjoyed AWAKENINGS, but is now worried about
getting encephalitis!)  If your pre-teen wants to go, you might suggest
they watch Zeffirelli's ROMEO AND JULIET on tape first, to see if they can
follow it.
     HAMLET is definitely worth seeing on a big screen.  There are some
lovely sweeping shots that will get lost on TV.  It's also worth paying
full price for.  I'd give it an 8.
Laurie Mann ** lmann@jjmhome.UUCP ** Laurie_Mann@m80.stratus.com
NeXT mail: lmann@vineland.pubs.stratus.com

Title
Review for In & Out (1997)
I thought it was about the most charming movie I'd
seen in a long time.  How could anyone, male, female,
gay, straight, not fall madly in love with Kevin
Kline's performance in this movie?  He's witty,
handsome, bright, and he tries so hard to do the
right thing that he never did sit down and have
that very long talk with himself that he should
have long ago.
Even Tom Selleck, despite the kind of sleazy character
he plays in this film, is likeable.  About the only two
people you really want to butcher are a couple of the
school employees, who display the only out-and-out
homophobia in the film.  (Some is displayed by
a few of the students, but they get over it pretty fast.)
In and Out is a comic gem, one of those great movies that
delivers laughs well beyond what they show in the trailer or
in the commercials.  Kevin Kline and Joan Cusack are hysterical
as the couple propelled by advancing age and a pushy mother into
a wedding that she really wants and he's willing to go along with.
The movie satirizes all kinds of things related to 
Hollywood, especially Entertainment Tonight and Forrest
Gump.  Interestingly, it doesn't satirize small town life
that much, except for Howard's relationship with his
mother, at the bachelor party, and a little at the
end.  Small-town life, is, for the most part, played straight.
I do have one big complaint about this movie, and
that is its sense of time:
The movie is supposed to begin very close to Oscar time.
Anyone who lives in the northern part of the country (as
Indiana was in the last time I looked) knows that late
March is a very gray time of year.  The crocuses are
blooming and the leaves haven't hit the trees yet.  You can
see a few green buds here and there.  There's often still
ice on the small ponds and bits of snow.
So this movie looks like it was filmed in the middle of
summer.  Everything is very green and there are flowers everywhere.
It might have driven the point home better about
Howards deeply-buried sexuality to have everything
look kind of gray and barren, and maybe the flowers
start blooming once Howard starts to deal with it.
Further, they have high school graduation happening a few
days later!  Hello...Hollywood?  What public school in
America has graduation in the first week of April?
The "graduation" scene didn't need to be graduation at all.
It could have been one of these scenes where the administration
has called a meeting to discuss Howard.  The results would
have been the same.  It was shere bad planning.
Anyway, other than these nuscances, I did like the movie
very much, and congratulate Rudnick, Oz and a wonderful
cast for making one of the funniest movies I've seen in a long time.
-- 
Laurie D. T. Mann        ***      lmann@ISPcity-net.com
   (Delete all caps to spam-bust the E-mail address.)
Dead People Server:  http://www.city-net.com/~lmann/dps

Title
Review for Switch (1991)
     SWITCH is a clever idea with a very strong lead in search of a
decent script and supporting characters.  If it weren't for Ellen
Barkin's outstanding performance, it wouldn't be worth anyone's time.
It was a major disappointment for me, especially since Blake Edwards'
previous gender-bender (VICTOR/VICTORIA) was perceptive, sharp, and very
funny for the entire movie.  SWITCH is just plain muddled.
     There was a movie with overtones of SWITCH made in the early
1980s---I think it was called GOODBYE CHARLIE, and Debbie Reynolds plays
the reincarnated man.  I think it was a funnier movie than SWITCH.  In
SWITCH, a slime named Steve Brooks is murdered while in the company of
three of his ex-lovers.  Brooks is sent back to Earth to find one woman
who loves him, or be sent straight to hell.  The devil makes it more
complicated for him by giving Steve an instant sex change.  So Steve,
now calling himself Amanda, has to cope with being an MCP in a woman's
body that he is *quite* attracted to.  Amanda is hysterical at first,
but suddenly realizes she can either be a woman or be dead.  She decides
to live with it.
     SWITCH is one of those movies that virtually every funny scene in
the movie is in the trailer.  The script just refuses to take many
chances, and the supporting characters aren't at all interesting.  The
hair and high heel jokes turn tired instantly, but are repeated for
about an hour of the movie.  I think Amanda might have dressed like a
super-fem once or twice, but would have quit in favor of comfort.  The
sparks never really fly between Amanda and Walter (Jimmy Smits, an
earnest performance but basically a flat one), as drinking buddies with
a twist.
     The one part of the movie that *might* have been interesting was
the possible relationship between Amanda and Ms. Flaxon (Lorraine
Braccho).  Amanda knows that Ms.  Flaxon is gay, and figures she can bed
her and get her business.  But Amanda faints rather than make love to a
woman, because, as one of his ex-lovers reminds him "You're a homophobe,
so you couldn't make love to a woman."  Apparently, an earlier cut of
the movie *did* land them in bed, but it was re-edited.  A pity.
     The only supporting character who "had a life" was JoBeth Williams
as one of Amanda's murderous ex-lovers.  She was *very* funny as the
flustered, rich murderer who only lived to party.
     This movie is a six on the Chuck scale, but only because of
Barkin's performance.  She was terrific.  Otherwise, stay home and watch
VICTOR/VICTORIA or TOOTSIE if you want to see a good gender-bender
comedy.
     A comment on the ending:  Did anyone *not* see that one coming??????

Title
Review for Kindergarten Cop (1990)
     If you're looking for a fun movie, you can't do much better than
KINDERGARTEN COP.  No, it isn't brain surgery, but it's a funny,
well-paced movie that pits Arnold Schwarzenegger against murderers and
kindergarteners.
     The movie opens in a mall in LA where John Kimball (Arnie) is
trailing a hoodlum.  Said hoodlum shoots a man, which Kimball misses,
but a friend of the man sees it.  The friend doesn't want to cooperate,
but Kimball convinces her to, and he learns that the hoodlum is looking
for his son, who is hiding in Oregon.  Kimball is able to put the
hoodlum in jail, but the hoodlum has a mother who effectively prevents
the friend from testifying against her baby boy.
     But this is the throwaway part of the movie.  The movie really
starts humming when Kimball and O'Hara (wonderfully played by Pamela
Reed) go up to Astoria, Oregon to infiltrate the kindergarten and find
out which kid has such a dangerous father and would his mysterious
mother turn state's evidence against a man she's been running away from
for four years.  Illness prevents O'Hara, an ex-teacher herself, from
going to school, so Kimball has to teach the kids.  There are lots of
funny scenes here, more than the trailer would show you.  The kids are
cast *very* well.  They aren't too cute, and they aren't overly
destructive.  A few say some truly outrageous (but always true) things,
like "My Dad is a gynecologist.  He spends all day looking up vaginas."
     I particularly enjoyed the wonderful rapport that O'Hara and
Kimball had.  When Kimball starts falling for one of the other teachers
(and a prime suspect for the runaway mother), O'Hara magically becomes
"Ursula," Kimball's sister from Austria.  Penelope Miller gives a nice
performance as said teacher, and the Cousins twins give a sweet
performance as her overly helpful son, Dominick.
     Arnie has a knack for choosing good scripts.  I don't think he's
been in a bad movie since the Conan flicks (though his first film was
one of the worst movies of all time--HERCULES IN NEW YORK).  He's not
a great actor, and he can't be subtle, but he's very enjoyable.
     It's PG-13---should kids see it?  It depends.  A few of the kids
use correct anatomical words and that may bother some parents.  There's
a scene with brief male nudity (no, not Arnie).  The last fifteen minutes
or so, when the hoodlum father and his slimey mother arrive in Astoria,
may bother some sensitive children.  My ten-year-old daughter really
enjoyed it.
     Oh, and all you Pamela Reed fans out there---there's is a superb
moment for you just before the end of the movie.  I won't say what
happens but I know I enjoyed it!
     I hate movies that advertive themselves as "the feel-good movie of
the year," but I think KINDERGARTEN COP was just that for me.

Title
Review for Betsy's Wedding (1990)
     Alan Alda makes very irritating movies.  They are never 100% bad,
but they are always inconsistent, with good performances hidden by poor
performances, boring writing intercut with wry observations on life, and
clumsy direction.  Of his movies, I liked SWEET LIBERTY the best, though
it, too, suffered from all the things I've mentioned here.  BETSY'S
WEDDING is a very typical Alda movie.
     BETSY'S WEDDING follows the few months between the time Betsy
(Molly Ringwald) announces her engagement and marries a young man from a
very rich family.  Every pre-wedding cliche in the book is played out in
the interim.  Rich fiance's family tries to take over, but Betsy's Dad
(Alan Alda) insists that he'll handle everything.  Both Ringwald and
Alda are incredibly dull in this movie, as is her fiance.  (He's so dull
I can neither remember the name of the character he played, nor the name
of the actor himself!)
     Many of the supporting characters give wonderful performance.
Madeline Kahn, as Betsy's Mom, and ????, as Steve Vidi, the the
sweet-natured hood, particularly stand out.  Joe Pesci gives his
patented hyper performance as Betsy's uncle.  The subplots dealing with
the underworld, and Steve's devotion to Betsy's cop sister (Ally Sheedy)
were both more fun than the main plot.
     This is probably worth watching when it hits cable, for a few hours
of mindless "entertainment."  It's about a 6 on the Chuck scale.
     This movie is rated R, probably just because of some sex-talk.
HAMLET was much more graphic, and was rated PG-13!

Title
Review for Spitfire Grill, The (1996)
I missed Spitfire Grill when it was out in the theaters, though it
got wildly enthusiastic comments from viewers as diverse as
my daughter and my mother.  So I rented it last night and
really enjoyed the first half of the film.  It's the sort of
movie with almost no surprises, but some of the details are
a hoot, especially the location of the Maine Travel Bureau
operators.
We're introduced to a very young prison inmate named
Percy, played by the remarkable Allison Elliott.  She's
extremely creative and an eager learner, but clearly a person
without much education and a rough past.  Upon her release she's
sent to a small town in what's supposed to be rural Maine.
She goes to work for Hannah, the owner of the Spitfire Grill.
The townspeople are a series of horrific cliches, being so
small-minded they hardly even talk to the young woman, even to
the point of not ordering their meals from her in the grill.
This ludicrous behavior does go away pretty fast, so most of the
first half of the movie or so deals with Percy trying to adjust to
life outside, with Hannah adjusting to Percy and yet another
debilitating injury and with Shelby who comes to help them both.
And the first half of the movie or so is very pleasant and
reasonably-true-to-life, almost like a small British movie.
The script is interesting in that parts of it don't insult the
viewer's intelligence.  Some things happen in the background that
later become very important in the film, but the writer doesn't
feel the need to batter the viewer over the head with them.
So I felt the script had lots of potential, at least in the first 
half.  
There are a few problems with the movie overall, and they probably
never bothered the average viewer, but, being a New Englander, they
bothered me.  The movie is supposed to be set up in rural, central
Maine, somewhere near Lewiston or Bethel.  However, that area tends
to be filled with forests and lakes, and I don't remember so much of it
having been cleared for farms.  It was actually filmed in northeastern
Vermont, probably because rural Maine is just too remote.
So you get some beautiful shots of Vermont countryside, and a
particularly sweeping shot of Lake Willoughby gap (where one
large mountain became two smaller ones back during the last ice age)
in the distance.  Similarly, the accents of almost everyone in the
movie is likewise "grafted on."  Just like rural Vermont and rural Maine
look different, an upstate Maine resident doesn't have the identical
speech patterns of an upstate Vermonter.  Its the sort of thing
that it's better to just let the folks speak without any accent at
all than to force them to sound so unnatural.
But these are kind of minor things that no one noticed.
The acting, especially of the women in this picture, is quite good,
so there's plenty to hold your interest.
However, what surprises me is that no one ever
mentioned the gross misogyny that permeates almost every
frame of the last third of this film. The Catholic Church, 
a major financier of this film, has shown once again how much 
it really has a major problem with how it treats women.
I remember hearing a church representative talk about how
life-affirming this movie is.  Hardly.  The movie goes absolutely
out of its way to promote the "woman as martyr" image.
The first hint of the kind of sick direction this movie was going
take was in Percy's reaction to a man named Joe.  Joe took a shine
to her and asks her out, takes her for walks, etc.  Percy seems to
like him, but doesn't want to get too close.  Finally, Joe asks her
to marry him.  She turns him down because he wants children and
she can't have them.  He says he doesn't care about that, but she's
adamant.  
Hannah is very bitter about her son who went to Viet Nam and
didn't come back.  Well, at least on the surface.  It's clear her
son went AWOL and is hiding and its Hannah's insufferable pride
and the small town memories of her husband's valor in WW II
that helps keep her son away from the help he so obviously needs.
He's kind of a Bo-Radleyesque character, but this is the '90s
not the '30s so keeping the son "a secret" just seems wrong.
And then there's Nahum, Shelby's husband and Hannah's nephew.
He's a quietly viscious man who is nasty to Shelby and to Percy.
He's supposed to have "redeemed" himself at the end of the movie
by owning up to one terrible wrong he committed, but the
scene was just terribly awkward.
And there's the situation that landed Percy in prison. Near the
end of the movie, she tells Shelby her story. She was
sexually abused by her stepfather and made pregnant by him she she
was 16.  Since this movie was financed by the Catholic Church,
she, naturally, loves the baby of the man who raped her, and is
devastated when he beats her so badly that she looses the baby and
her ability to ever have children again.  She is kidnapped out of
the hospital by this man and kills him in self defense.  You
have to ask yourself what kind of incompetent lawyer did she have,
that landed her in jail for even 30 seconds much less five years
for manslaughter.
As you might have guessed by now, Percy dies by the end of the movie
in trying to warn the AWOL son that the police are trying to find him
because they think she gave him money "she stole" from Hannah.
And the lesson the town learns is to be nice to strange women who
come to Gilead to attempt to have a new start at life.
This picture COULD have been life-affirming if only it hadn't sunk
to so much misongyny and melodrama.  It's not so obvious as
those movie that promote violence against women, but it's almost
more insidious.

Title
Review for Schindler's List (1993)
     SCHINDLER'S LIST is simply the best movie of the decade (and the
second movie I've ever given a 10 to on "the list").  As upsetting as
the movie is to watch, it is gripping and wondrous.
     The movie opens quietly with a pre-war Polish Jewish family
lighting candles and saying prayers on Friday night.  The family
vanishes, and, in time, the candles burn out.
     The scene switches to a man carefully dressing, stuffing his hand
with money & carefully pinning a Nazi pin to his lapel.  He is a
shadowy figure, paying his way to get a fine table at a fancy
restaurant in Krakow, and catching the eye of some Nazi officers.
Schindler is just a glad-handing business man making contacts and
buying influence.  Soon his wining and dining pays off, as he acquires
a factory recently taken by the government as it was Jewish-owned.
     Schindler's one ambition in life is to retire with several steamer
trunks of money.  He sees running a pot factory in wartime Krakow as
the way to riches.  He finds the accountant who used to manage the
books for the factory and urges him to come to work for him.
Mr. Klein, cautiously played by Ben Kingsley, reluctantly agrees.  Since
Jews are cheap labor, Schindler tells Mr. Klein to find people to work
for him.
     Klein serves as Schindler's conscience at a time when Schindler
does not seem to have one.  Granted, Schindler is not a murdering Nazi,
but he's hardly a "nice" man, either.  So Klein rounds up friends, many
of whom have never worked in a factory, and rescues them from
deportation.  ("But I have a vital job, I'm a history teacher!" one man
protests as the Nazis force him on a truck.)  Schindler does not
complain about all the on-the-job training, and is soon backing the
necessity of his workers after the Nazis shoot one for failing to
shovel snow fast enough for them.
     War and war-atrocities continue to dehumanize the unthinking Nazis
in this film (and if the film does have a weakness, it is that the
Nazis are so unrelentingly bad its as if they were not human), but it
abruptly humanizes Schindler.  The script is intelligent, the
performances feel completely real, and Spielberg deserves enormous
credit for directing this masterpiece.  Liam Neeson, a long
under-recognized actor, gives an extraordinary performance in this
movie.
     One wonders how much of himself Spielberg may have seen in
Schindler.  For years, it looked like Spielberg only wanted to make
money.  He has taken risks at least three times with his films:  THE
COLOR PURPLE, EMPIRE OF THE SUN and now with SCHINDLER'S LIST.  With
SCHINDLER'S LIST, he's completely fled from any hint of commercial
exploitation and has just made a great movie.
**   Laurie Mann  *  lmann@drycas.club.cc.cmu.edu  *  Laurie.Mann (GEnie) 

Title
Review for Regarding Henry (1991)
     REGARDING HENRY is the lastest in a series of intelligent movies
made by Mike Nichols, and starring Harrison Ford and Annette Benning.
While we can all go and gawk at a movie like TERMINATOR 2, REGARDING
HENRY is a well-acted, well-written, well-directed film that Hollywood
just doesn't make enough of.  It won't make mega-bucks, but I hope it
will do very well.
     Henry (Harrison Ford) is a hard-driven lawyer, who is in the wrong
place at the wrong time and is shot in the head by a convenience store
robber.  He is severely brain-injured, is in a coma for a week, and is
speechless for some time after his emergence from the coma.  Sarah
(Annette Benning) is stricken by his injury, but generally attempts to
keep a brave face.
     He's pulled out of his post-coma stupor by his therapists at a
rehab hospital.  Bradley (William Nunn) is a boisterous,
cut-the-bullshit therapist who inspires Henry to speak by throwing
Tabasco in his scrambled eggs, making him ask for something else.  In
time, Bradley pushes Henry to walk, and Henry's speech improves
gradually over the course of the movie.
      There's a major undercurrent in this theme about being tentative
about life.  Henry before the accident walked all over people and didn't
have a tentative bone in his body.  But, after the shooting, he's
extremely tentative (except when he takes up painting!).  Rachel (Mikki
Allen), Henry and Rachel's 12-year-old daughter, is the cautious,
tentative child of two rather driven, cold parents, and isn't sure how
to approach her now radically-different father.  Even Sarah, who very
much had her own agenda before the shooting, is sometimes reluctant to
make decisions afterward, even when Henry clearly can't.
      Reviewers will probably emphasize Ford's fine performance in this
picture, but I want to give special mention of Annette Benning.  She's
only been in a few movies so far, but she's made quite an appearance in
each.  In this movie, it would have been possible to play her as a
complete bitch, which Nichols and Benning chose not to do.  Sarah is a
very complicated character, and you often don't know what she's
thinking.  So as she blossoms into a "kinder, gentler" Sarah in the
last third of the movie, it's a very subtle transformation.

Title
Review for Shock to the System, A (1990)
     Still in search of a funny movie yesterday, I rented A SHOCK TO THE
SYSTEM, the most recent Michael Caine movie.  It was marketed as a black
comedy.  While it starts off pretty funny, and maintains a strong parody
of pecking order in a New York company, it runs out of gas once Caine
starts committing the murders he'd previously only thought about.
     This movie is at its best when it's a comedy of manners.  When you
watch the way people's co-workers suck up to them, it's quite
perceptive.  The relationship between Caine and his spendthrift wife
(Swoozie Kurtz) is amusing because her shrewishness is understated.
     But the movie just stops being interesting once it starts taking
itself too seriously.  Michael Caine, at times, comes across as being
deadly serious which added lead to the movie.  Elizabeth McGovern gave a
very sweet performance as Stella, Caine's smitten co-worker, but that
too muddied what could have been a sharper movie.

Title
Review for Toys (1992)
     This is one of the most frustrating movies of recent times.  For
the third time, Robin Williams has made an overblown movie of style over
substance (the other two being POPEYE (which I liked) and HOOK (which I
really didn't)).  Williams played the quietly manic son of a
recently-dead toy manufacturer whose inheritance is passed on to his
uncle.  Joan Cusack played his sister and Robin Wright played the woman
he gets interested in.  I don't remember the name of the actors who
played the uncle or Cousin Patrick.  I think the actor who played
Patrick was acting in his first movie, and he played his role so
straight that he provided a perfect foil for Williams and Cusack.
     The first hour of this movie is full of delight and fun surprises.
The writing is a tad weak, but the acting was pretty good considering.
In a movie like this, the acting usually dies before the writing does,
but that didn't happen here.  The art direction and camera angles were
inventive.  The movie starts to fall apart in the middle and dies during
the last half (though the last ten minutes or so return to being
quirky).
     Barry Levinson and the writer (or did Levinson write this one too?)
should be taken out and "re-educated".
     I saw this movie in a cinema with eight theaters.  When people saw
the long faces walk out of this movie at the end, about a third of the
people waiting went to see FOREVER YOUNG instead (the line for A FEW
GOOD MEN being too long).  This movie is being marketed as a comedy, but
for nearly twenty excruciating minutes, there's absolutely nothing funny
about it.

Title
Review for Steel Magnolias (1989)
     This is a *very* frustrating movie to watch.  You have some wonderful
performances (Sally Field and Julia Roberts), and others that are just so
overdone (Shirley MacLaine, Olympia Dukakis, Tom Skerrit) that they almost seem
to be part of another movie.  You have characters that make mysterious
transformations during the course of the movie, like Darryl Hannah and Sam
Shepard.  You have some clumsy sound editing which left half the audience
wondering why the other half was laughing.
     I basically liked the movie.  I laughed more at this movie more than at
any movie since EARTH GIRLS ARE EASY.  Even though I knew how weepy parts of
the movie would be, I still found myself crying.  There's a moment after her
daughter's funeral when Sally Field suddenly starts reacting with such fury
over the death that she reminded me of her performance in SYBIL.
     Maybe *that's* the problem.  I never got so involved in the movie that I
forgot I was watching a movie.  In films like CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS, ALWAYS,
and SAY ANYTHING, I literally forgot I was watching a film at times.  But,
here, Dolly Parton is playing the same good old girl we've seen her play in
many other movies.  Ann Wedgeworth is playing another Southern eccentric.
     The movie takes occasional risks.  Shirley MacLaine has never looked
worse, but it suits her character perfectly.  The relationship between Sally
Field and Julia Roberts is *very* complicated, but it's also pretty believable.
     I think I'd rate the movie about a 7 on the Chuck scale, because though
it's a flawed movie, I found it compelling just the same.  It's so rare to see
the friendships of a number of woman portrayed in a film.  Someone complained
somewhere about the lack of a strong male character anywhere in the picture.
All I can say is: ABOUT TIME!
Laurie Mann   **   harvard!m2c!jjmhome!lmann  ** lmann%jjmhome@m2c.m2c.org
Work: Stratus Computer ** Home: Northboro, MA ** lmann@jjmhome.UUCP          */

Title
Review for Rocketeer, The (1991)
     I dragged my husband and child off the the sneak preview of THE
ROCKETEER on Saturday, and I was very glad I did (even though I didn't
get a commemorative button).
     THE ROCKETEER is sort of a slower-moving Indy Jones movie with time
for a little character development and things like that.  The action
scenes are superb, and the performances are good.  And there are so many
little extras in this movie, I'm not sure where to begin.
     There's a thug in this movie who's the living image of Rondo
Hatton, a character actor who always played thugs in 1940s B-movies.  The
movie has much of the structure of a 1930s or 1940s movie, with heroic
heroes, villainous villains, an over-interest in the doings of
Hollywood, and a fancy restaurant scene with singing and dancing.  There
are "appearances" by folks like Clark Gable, W. C. Fields, Howard Hughes,
and other characters of the era.  Timothy Dalton gives a perfect
performance as an Errol Flynn-like actor with a penchant for over-acting.
And Jennifer Connelly has matured significantly since she played the
Dorothy-like character in LABYRINTH.
     This movie is solid and extremely enjoyable.  While there's some
sexual innuendo in the movie and some character endangerment,  I think
most kids over about 7 would like it (I think it's rated PG).  It was
also a pleasure to see Alan Arkin in a film---where the hell has he been
lately???  The lead actor is amiable enough as the Rocketeer, but I
can't say he gave the sort of performance that Harrison Ford did in the
Indy movies.  While he maybe could have used a charisma transplant, he
was okay.  (Besides, if we still need charisma, we can go see Kevin
Costner this weekend!!)
     I disagree strongly with the earlier poster who compared this film
to BATMAN (and the poster didn't like BATMAN either).  BATMAN was a film
where style triumphed over all.  THE ROCKETEER never quite lets style
overtake a very compressed story.
     This is a solid 7 on the Chuck scale.  Absolutely worth your time,
and a movie you can take your kids to (even if they did have a preview
of TERMINATOR II which featured full sidal nudity of Arne!)

Title
Review for Thelma & Louise (1991)
     THELMA & LOUISE is the latest in the new genre of "female buddy movies."
The movie is pretty strong, the acting is quite wonderful and I recommend it.
     Thelma (Geena Davis) is a repressed housewife, and Louise (Susan
Sarandon) is a more-worldly waitress who decide to go fishing one
weekend.  The chemistry between these women is terrific from the
beginning as they take a silly picture of one another as they jump in
the car, Louise's '65 Mustang convertible.
     Thelma, sick to death of her dorky husband, suggests they stop for
a drink, and they stop at a divey bar with loads of CW music and loads
of pseudo-cowboys.  One of them, Harlan, takes notice of Thelma, dances
with her as she gets drunk, then takes her out to the parking lot to
"not hurt her" as Thelma protests in drunken and fruitless ways.  But
Louise comes to the rescue, threatens Harlan with a gun, and winds up
shooting him when he mouths off to her one time too many.  (A pity
Louise was rather drunk at the time ... she could have shot him in a more
appropriate location!)
     The movie really picks up from here, as Thelma and Louise try to
stay several steps in front of the law.  The men are not all
cookie-cutter creeps, like Harlan and Daryl (Thelma's husband).
Louise's boyfriend Jimmy is alternately sweet and considerate, yet
violent at times.  Slocum, the man sent to investigate Harlan's murder,
is fascinated by the women, because everyone who has seen the women
insist they aren't the murdering kind.  Thelma blossoms in the course of
the movie, becoming someone who won't take shit from anyone.  And all
Louise can see is getting to Mexico, while avoiding Texas...
     The photography is pretty good, and there's a neat sequence of
driving through the New Mexico desert at night, the world quiet and dark
except for the car lights flashing off the rock formations.
     I have mixed feelings on the ending.  On the one hand, even trying
to talk to the cops would have been pointless.  On the other hand,
driving into the canyon rather than compromising somewhere seemed overly
strong.  I agree with an earlier poster who observed that showing some
earlier scenes from their escapades was an attempt to soften the ending,
and wasn't appropriate.

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
Contact - a solid 8 on the IMDB scale - is one of the few
intelligently written and acted SF movies I've seen recently.
SF movies tend to be either complete logical blowouts
(Independence Day/Jurassic Park/Fifth Element) or
farcical (Men in Black). While Contact has some problems
with time (a multi-national project costing hundreds
of billions of dollars completed in under three years
based on schematics from out of this world?),
it's mostly right on target.
What made this movie particularly good is the time
Roboert Zemeckis took with his direction.  Many SF movies are
audio/visual assaults on the senses.  There's an awful lot
of quiet against a panorama of some of the finest special
effects ever created.  The first two minutes of
the movie set the tone and style for what's to come.
When there is a visual assault late in the movie, it's
a brief interlude  comparable to the climax of 2001.
The performances are pretty good - Rob Lowe is so smarmy as
the Ralph Reedish-character you want to slap him - and
Zemeckis wisely doesn't let the special effects overshadow
the characters.  People complained about the insertion of
Bill Clinton video in this movie, but I thought it mostly
worked.  I would like to have seen a little more of John
Hurt as the mysterious billionaire, but I suppose it added
to his mystery.

Title
Review for My Left Foot (1989)
     Just who *is* Daniel Day Lewis anyway?  He's gone off and lost himself in
yet another superbly-acted role.
     MY LEFT FOOT is the story of Christy Brown, a person so crippled by
cerebral palsy that most people thought he was retarded until he was around
ten.  It is the story of how Christy struggles to communicate with the rest of
the world.  The movie is astonishingly good, with strong performances by the
entire cast, but particularly Daniel Day Lewis as Christy, Brenda Fricker as
Mother, and Hugh O'Connel (?) as young Christy.
     The story is told in flashbacks, and it's handled very well.  Christy,
who's written MY LEFT FOOT and has already received national acclaim as a
artist, is invited to a lengthy benefit at a manor in Britain.  Since he does
not like to appear in public, he spends most of the benefit in a side room in
the company of a nurse.  The nurse reads his book, so Christy's story unfolds
as she reads.
     The details about living in a poor neighborhood in Dublin abound in most
of the movie.  The Browns have too many children, live in too small a house,
and are well-meaning but uneducated people.  Mother believes that Christy is
intelligent, and talks to him all the time, even though he can't respond.
Father is convinced he's an idiot, but loves him just the same.  His many
brothers and sisters accept him as much as they can.
     There's a wonderful scene early in the picture when Mother falls down the
stairs after having brought Christy upstairs.  He hears her fall, and hears her
silence.  He throws himself off the bed, scampers down the stairs, crawls over
his mother, and makes an enormous racket by pounding on the door with his foot.
When the neighbors respond to the noise and take Christy's mother to the
hospital, they assume she'd fallen with Christy in her arms---they cannot
conceive that he literally saved his mother's life.
     As his family gradually learns that he *is* intelligent, they build him a
cart and take him outside.  But Christy never does fit in outside.  So, as he
gets older, he becomes more reclusive.
     The older Christy is shown struggling to communicate and to be accepted.
He has all the usual needs of a young man, but almost no one believes it.  When
he learns that the woman he's *very* interested in is about to marry, he
becomes furious.  The scene of his fury is painful to watch, because how can
you express fury if you can't yell or pound your fists or chew the scenery
(though Lewis comes close...)?  This scene is particularly hard to watch, but
it is extremely well-constructed.
     The movie has one minor failing---it often ignores the hordes of little
children who populated the house most of the time.  Mother seems to be able to
devote an enormous amount of time to Christy, despite the fact that he was one
of about ten children.  Christy seems to be in the one children's bedroom by
himself quite a lot.  Eventually, his father and brothers build him his own
room off the kitchen, but it would have made more sense to show Christy trying
to paint with all his brothers and sisters around.
     The movie progresses slowly, but I was never bored.  In fact, I think it
should have lasted about another ten minutes or so (how's that for "purient
interest"?).  It was rated R, but that was probably just for bad language.
     Anyway, I think this is a 9 on the Chuck scale.  The Critics' Consensus, a
national consensus of 40 leading movie critics, rates this movie as a 9.4, the
highest average on the list.  ROGER AND ME rated a 9.3, and DRIVING MISS DAISY,
a 9.  By contrast, TANGO AND CASH, SKI PATROL, and LOOSE CANNONS each ranked
under 3.
*** Laurie Mann ** harvard!m2c!jjmhome!lmann ** lmann%jjmhome@m2c.m2c.org ***

Title
Review for Awakenings (1990)
     It should be an interesting Academy Award ceremonies this year,
when the lead performers in the movies of Rob Reiner and Penny Marshall
(ex-spouses who, apparently, do not get along well) will probably win
the top awards--Kathy Bates for Misery and Robert DeNiro for AWAKENINGS.
     AWAKENINGS is an extraordinary movie.  It has some parallels to
RAIN MAN and CHARLY, but it's much stronger.  Penny Marshall excels at
setting a mood, she makes you understand what it's like to be a child in
the late 1920s in the first ten minutes of the film.  The action jumps
ahead forty years, to a dismal, depressing psychiatric hospital in New
York, where Dr. Sayer (Robin Williams) reluctantly takes a job as as
researcher.  He's used to working with earthworms but, sadly, the
long-time catatonics he comes into contact with aren't much better off.
     Dr. Sayer believes he sees flickers of life behind the catatonic
masks of his patients.  While some can bearly move, they have some
reflexes, and a few seem to respond a little to their surroundings.  One
patient, Lucy, catches her glasses, and walks along the pattern on the
floor, only stopping when the pattern ends.  Another patient, Leonard,
exhibits brain activity when his name is spoken during an EEG.  Sayer
tries to stimulate these patients, to prove that they comprehend what's
happening to them, and has mixed results.
     Dr. Sayer finds out that a drug, L-dopa, has made improvements in
the lives of Parkinson's patients, and he gets permission to try it on a
patient.  He chooses Leonard (Robert DeNiro), and Leonard, gradually,
comes out of a thirty year sleep.
     The relationship between Leonard and Sayer is remarkable.  Sayer
is a very caring man, but he's painfully shy and inhibited.  Leonard has
been forced inward by neurological damage, but he's determined to do
whatever he can, to experience everything he's missed.  Sayer helps
Leonard cope with the missing years, and Leonard helps Sayer learn as
much as he can about the drug.
     The most unbelievable part of the movie was the mass drug-testing
of the entire catatonic ward.  Maybe that's the way it "really"
happened, but the ward staff was incredibly stretched caring "just" for
catatonics.  They were hopelessly overworked once fifteen
neurologically-damaged yet awake people populated their ward.   These
scenes have the feel of Cocoon, and were out-of-place with the rest of
the movie.
     There are many wonderful performances in this movie.  The actress
who played Leonard's devoted mother gave co-dependency a whole new
meaning.  She's not evil, and she's happy that Leonard is better, but
she has trouble coping with a fifty-year-old adolescent.  Julie Kavner
did a nice turn as Sayer's supportive nurse, Elinor.  And Alice Drummond
as the gentle, confused Lucy, was also quite good.
     The performances of Williams and DeNiro are extraordinary, Williams
for the subtleness, and DeNiro for the range.  When performers are
mismatched (Cruise and Hoffman in RAIN MAN and Redford and Streep in OUT
OF AFRICA spring instantly to mind), the movie suffers.  But these
performers work perfectly together.  
     Penny Marshall is one of the most important directors of the day.
Even with a weak script (JUMPING JACK FLASH), she consistently gets good
performances from her performers, and all her movies have lovely details.
The homes of the characters in Marshall movies look like places where
people live.  And her vision of New York isn't quite as grand as Woody
Allen's---again, it's a "lived in" place.

Title
Review for Heathers (1989)
     I've been depressed and overworked lately, and looked for a comedy
at the video store.  Even though it was about teenagers and suicide (not
two of my favorite subjects) I rented HEATHERS.  It was a very erratic
black comedy, but worthwhile, particularly if you like Winona Ryder or
Christian Slater, or if you hated high school.
     Parts of HEATHERS are very dreamlike, and these parts are intercut
by fairly accurate portrayals of the chaos of high school.  Ryder plays
the confident of a group of vacuous high school girls, all of whom are
named Heather.  Ryder is fascinated by Slater, the bad, new kid at
school, and son of a man who blows up buildings for a living.  After one
of the Heathers embarrasses her, Ryder decides to take her revenge.  But
the revenge turns out to be a murder, and it's "rearranged" to look like
a suicide.
     The movie is a little ragged on the edges, but its portrayal of the
mind set of high school students and teachers is right on the money.
And both Ryder and Slater turn in terrific performances.

Title
Review for Defending Your Life (1991)
     Albert Brooks is at it again, making another movie about one man's
quest to redeem himself.  Brooks directed, acted, and starred in
Defending Your Life, the very funny story of a man defending his life
after his death.
     Brooks is a Muppie (Middle-aged Urban Professional---what happens
to Yuppies after 35) who is clearly beloved by his coworkers.  But on
his 39th birthday, Daniel (Brooks) absent-mindedly crashes his new BMW
convertible into a bus, and finds himself someplace else.  The someplace
else is Judgement City, and it's a place people go after they die.  At
first, Daniel is just dazed, and meekly does whatever he is told.
     Judgement City is a wonderful creation, and Brooks deserves loads
of credit for creating the most amusing afterlife since BEETLEJUICE.
This is the afterlife as if the US government created it---everything is
very orderly, there are lots of glass towers, you can eat anything you
want and never gain weight, and people who behaved very well in their
lives get the best accommodations.  Daniel, for example, winds up in a
place that's a lot like a Holiday Inn.
     Daniel is instructed to go to meet his lawyer, Mr. Diamond.  The
purpose of a stay in Judgement City is to see if you are ready to go
onto the "next stage," or if you need to return to Earth to conquer your
fears by living another life.  He has to watch himself from nine
different days in his life and defend his actions.  These scenes show
him to be basically well-meaning yet fearful.
     When he isn't defending himself, Daniel discovers a woman, Julia
(wonderfully played by Meryl Streep).  Julia is a very sweet, vivacious
woman for someone recently dead.  She and Daniel take to each other
right away---after all, they are some of the few young people there.
It's clear that Julia is destined for the "next stage," and that Daniel,
no matter how good his intentions, is destined to return to Earth to try
again.
     Here's a spoiler only if you've never seen a commercial or trailer
for the film:
     The ending is shown in every commercial and trailer ever shown for
this movie.  This was a mistake.
     This movie is very sweet and good-natured and very funny.  However,
aside from Brooks and Streep, the other performances were aggravatingly
muted.  Jim, my husband, wished Robert Preston was alive to play Mr.
Diamond, because Rip Torn gave an annoying, two-note sort of
performance.  Likewise, Lee Grant was utterly colorless as the
prosecuting attorney.
     While there is much amusing in this movie, and I do recommend it
because the leads are so strong, Brooks belabors a few jokes.  The
eating-all-you-want comments got to be a bit much, along with the "small
brain" jokes.  I rate it a 7 on the Chuck scale.
     Oh, members of the Gaffe Squad will notice a minor one when Daniel
and Diamond are eating lunch.  I already sent a note about it to PREMIERE
magazine.

Title
Review for Godfather: Part III, The (1990)
     It's Christmas night and I'm eating frozen lasagna for dinner.
     That probably expresses my emotions about THE GODFATHER III more
than any formal review I could write.
     But that's a cheat.  Maybe some people out there prefer frozen
lasagna the real thing, and may think I'm praising the movie, so I'd
better be explicit.
     I'm a real fan of both THE GODFATHER I & II, and looked forward to
GIII for a long time.  While Coppola's had a long run of bad luck,
APOCALYPSE NOW, the "Godfather" movies, and PEGGY SUE GOT MARRIED are
some of my favorite movies.  I thought he could pull a third "Godfather"
movie off.
     The third "Godfather" movie is a triumph of style over substance.
The set decorations are wonderful.  But the direction, acting and
scripting of this movie are pitiful.  The direction is particularly
poor.  Combine this with the ragged editing and you have a real mess.
People who didn't see the first movie might be lost.  On the other hand,
it might help to not be familiar with those earlier fine films.
     The basic problem with this movie is that it is stupidly written.  The plot
is pretty unbelievable to begin with, and it includes elements that are
ludicrous.  One of the strengths of the first two movies was that it was
believable.  GIII is as close to reality as PEGGY SUE GOT MARRIED was.
     My complaints with this movie are many and varied, but they center
around the scripting for and acting of the character of Michael
Corleone.  In the first two movies, Puzo, Coppola and Pacino created a
tragic figure.  In the third movie, he's just an old man in decline.  In
the first two movies, you could both sympathize with and be afraid of
Michael.  In the third, it's hard to do either.  Pacino has the same
dour, frozen expression for about two-thirds of this movie.  When he
finally smiles, you expect his face to break.
     I'd hoped initial rumors about the acting ability of Sofia Coppola
might have been off base.  They weren't.  In the words of another
reviewer about another actress, "She runs the gamut of emotion from A to
B."  I like that she didn't look like an actress, but, other than that,
an exhausted Winona Ryder still would have acted circles around this
young woman.  Maybe Coppola will grow into being a fine actress---women
like Sally Field, Jessica Lange and Farrah Fawcett didn't act in their
first few movies either, and they've improved dramatically.  
     Other than the sets, what can I praise about this movie?  Not much.
Andy Garcia and Talia Shire turn in the best performances of the movie.
Diane Keaton was better than she was in GII.
     GI moved from being about Don Vito to being about Michael.  It was
subtle at times about the way power corrupts people, and sometimes it
hit you over the head with it.  Part of the power in GI and GII was
watching the payoff at the end of each movie.  In GI, Michael becomes
the Godfather, literary and figuratively.  In GII, Michael has become
hollow and corrupt.  In GIII, Michael strives for redemption, and it's
clear he doesn't get it, even though he long outlives his enemies.
     The opera scene, and the shoot-out on the steps afterwards were
both way too long.  It would have been a stronger movie to find out what
happened to Vinnie after the shoot-out.  During the last third of the
film, it's hinted that Vinnie is double-crossing Michael.  We don't know
if this is the case or not.  This was too important a point to drop.
     I'd guess about a third of the audience (and the theater was
pretty full) was moved by the ending, but most of us got out of our
seats and left in a hurry.  No one applauded.  Arrgghhh...I haven't been
this disappointed by a movie in a very long time.  Coppola should have
stopped while he was ahead (yes, I know he made the movie in return for
a picture deal from Paramount...).
